Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
Article 9 Georgia Information Sharing and Analysis Center

35-3-200.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Center” means the Georgia Information Sharing and Analysis Center.

“Fusion center” means collaborative effort which combines resources, expertise, intelligence, and other information from various agencies of state and local governments with the goal of maximizing the ability of this state to detect, prevent, and respond to criminal activities or to otherwise engage in homeland security activities.

“Homeland security activity” means any activity related to the prevention or discovery of, response to, or recovery from:

A terrorist attack;

A hostile military or paramilitary action; or

An extraordinary law enforcement emergency, as designated by the Governor.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-200

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 91, § 5/SB 416; Ga. L. 2018, p. 681, § 2-1/HB 779.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added “, as designated by the Governor” at the end of subparagraph (3)(C).

35-3-201.
Georgia Information Sharing and Analysis Center established; purpose.

There is established the Georgia Information Sharing and Analysis Center as a distinct division within the Georgia Bureau of Investigation. The center shall be a fusion center maintaining criminal intelligence and terrorism analytical components. The officer or agent charged with operating the center shall report directly to the director.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-201

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 91, § 5/SB 416; Ga. L. 2018, p. 681, § 2-1/HB 779.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, inserted “as a distinct division” in the first sentence and added the third sentence.

35-3-202.
[Reserved] Responsibilities of director for center operations.

History.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 91, § 5/SB 416; repealed by Ga. L. 2018, p. 681, § 2-1/HB 779, effective July 1, 2018.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 681, § 2-1/HB 779 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2018.

35-3-203.
Cooperative activities of center.

The center shall share and provide homeland security activity information to the director of emergency management and homeland security, including, but not limited to, threats, warnings, and developing situations, when an investigation reveals conduct of a terroristic nature or in material support of terroristic activities, recruitment of terrorists, or information on the activities of known terrorist organizations.

The center shall liaise with the Federal Bureau of Investigation, Joint Terrorism Task Force, United States Department of Homeland Security, and other local, state, and federal intelligence and law enforcement officials for purposes of carrying out its duties and responsibilities under this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-203

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 91, § 5/SB 416; Ga. L. 2018, p. 681, § 2-1/HB 779.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, deleted “director through the” following “The” near the beginning of subsection (a); deleted “the bureau,” following “liaise with” near the beginning of subsection (b); deleted former subsection (c), which read: “The center shall allow unrestricted access to secure communications equipment to the director of emergency management and homeland security and his or her representatives who possess the appropriate federally approved security clearances for the dissemination of homeland security activity information by the United States Department of Homeland Security.”; and deleted former subsection (d), which read: “The director of emergency management and homeland security shall serve as this state’s security manager for the purpose of identifying and processing state personnel for security clearances through the United States Department of Homeland Security.”

35-3-204.
Membership; availability of analysts.

Membership in the center shall consist of the director, the director of emergency management and homeland security, the commissioner of public safety, the commissioner of natural resources, the commissioner of corrections, the state fire marshal, the Attorney General, the adjutant general, and state and local fire service, law enforcement, homeland security, emergency management, corrections, and other appropriate agencies and disciplines as determined by the director. Such members may assign or make available their analysts or other personnel to the center as such need is determined by the director.

The director of emergency management and homeland security may maintain Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency analysts in the center as determined by the director of emergency management and homeland security. Such analysts assigned to the center who are funded by or employees of the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency shall focus on homeland security activity.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-3-204

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 91, § 5/SB 416; Ga. L. 2018, p. 681, § 2-1/HB 779.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in subsection (a), deleted “of emergency management and homeland security in consultation with the director” following “the director” at the end of the first sentence, in the second sentence, substituted “may assign” for “shall assign” near the beginning, deleted “of emergency management and homeland security” following “the director” at the end; and, in subsection (b), in the first sentence, substituted “may maintain” for “shall maintain” near the beginning, and deleted “as needed” following “in the center” near the middle, and added the second sentence.